Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-838
Creation of condominium; procedure; additional units.

(a) A condominium may be created pursuant to sections 76-825 to 76-894 only by recording a declaration executed in the same manner as a deed. The declaration must be recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located.

(b) An amendment to a declaration adding units to a condominium that would increase the voting rights of the declarant within the association shall not be effective for that purpose until the foundation of each building containing additional units has been substantially completed.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 14;

Laws 1984, LB 1105, § 3.